Vermont, session 2025-2026, S169.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Appeals to the Board * * *
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 6025 is amended to read:
§ 6025. RULES
(a) The Board may adopt rules of procedure for itself and the District
Commissions. The Board’s procedure for approving regional plans and
regional plan maps, which may be adopted as rules or issued as guidance, shall
ensure that the maps are consistent with legislative intent as expressed in
section 2802 of this title and 24 V.S.A. §§ 4302 and 4348a. The Board shall
adopt rules of procedure that govern appeals and other contested cases before it
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 2 of 22
that are consistent with this chapter. The rules may include the Board’s use of
hearing officers and Board panels, where less than a quorum of members of the
Board hear a case.
* * *
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 6027(h) is amended to read:
(h) The Board may shall hear:
(1) all appeals from an act or decision of a District Commission under
this chapter, including fee refund requests under section 6083a of this title; and
(2) appeals from an act or decision of a district coordinators under
subsection 6007(d) of this chapter.
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 6086(f) is amended to read:
(f) Prior to any appeal of a permit issued by a District Commission, any
aggrieved party may file a request for a stay of construction with the District
Commission together with a declaration of intent to appeal the permit. The
stay request shall be automatically granted for 14 days upon receipt and notice
to all parties and pending a ruling on the merits of the stay request pursuant to
Board rules. The automatic stay shall not extend beyond the 30-day appeal
period unless a valid appeal has been filed with the Environmental Division
Board. The automatic stay may be granted only once under this subsection
during the 30-day appeal period. Following appeal of the District Commission
decision, any stay request must be filed with the Environmental Division
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 3 of 22
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 220 of this title Board. A District
Commission shall not stay construction authorized by a permit processed under
the Board’s minor application procedures.
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 6089 is amended to read:
§ 6089. APPEALS
Appeals of any act or decision of a District Commission under this chapter
or a district coordinator under subsection 6007(c) of this title shall be made to
the Environmental Division in accordance with chapter 220 of this title. For
the purpose of this section, a decision of the Chair of a District Commission
under section 6001e of this title on whether action has been taken to
circumvent the requirements of this chapter shall be considered an act or
decision of the District Commission.
(a)(1) Appeals to the Board. An appeal of any act or decision of a District
Commission shall be to the Board and shall be accompanied by a fee
prescribed by section 6083a of this title.
(2) Participation before District Commission. A person shall not appeal
an act or decision that was made by a District Commission unless the person
was granted party status by the District Commission pursuant to subdivision
6085(c)(1)(E) of this title, participated in the proceedings before the District
Commission, and retained party status at the end of the District Commission
proceedings. In addition, the person may only appeal those issues under the
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 4 of 22
criteria with respect to which the person was granted party status. However,
notwithstanding these limitations, a person may appeal an act or decision of the
District Commission if the Board determines that:
(A) there was a procedural defect that prevented the person from
obtaining party status or participating in the proceeding;
(B) the decision being appealed is the grant or denial of party status;
or
(C) some other condition exists that would result in manifest injustice
if the person’s right to appeal was disallowed.
(3) Filing the appeal. An appellant to the Board, under this section,
shall file with the notice of appeal a statement of the issues to be addressed in
the appeal, a summary of the evidence that will be presented, and a preliminary
list of witnesses who will testify on behalf of the appellant.
(4) De novo hearing. The Board shall hold a de novo hearing on all
findings requested by any party that files an appeal or cross appeal, according
to the rules of the Board. The Board may give due consideration to any
findings made by the District Commission. The hearing shall be held in the
municipality where the project subject to the appeal is located, if possible, or as
close as possible.
(5) Notice of appeal. Notice of appeal shall be filed with the Board
within 30 days following the act or decision by the District Commission. The
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 5 of 22
Board shall notify the parties who had party status before the District
Commission of the filing of any appeal.
(6) Prehearing discovery.
(A) A party may obtain discovery of expert witnesses who may
provide testimony relevant to the appeal. Expert witness prefiled testimony
shall be in accordance with the Vermont Rules of Evidence. The use of
discovery for experts shall comply with the requirements in Rules 26–37 of the
Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure.
(B) Interrogatories served on nonexpert witnesses shall be limited to
discovery of the identity of witnesses and a summary of each witness’s
testimony, except by order of the Board for cause shown. Interrogatories
served on expert witnesses shall be in accordance with the Vermont Rules of
Civil Procedure.
(C) Parties may submit requests to produce and requests to enter
upon land pursuant to Rule 34 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure.
(D) Parties may not take depositions of witnesses, except by order of
the Board for cause shown.
(E) The Board may require a party to supplement, as necessary, any
prehearing testimony that is provided.
(b) Prior decisions. Prior decisions of the former Environmental Board, the
Water Resources Board, the Waste Facilities Panel, and the Environmental
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 6 of 22
Division of the Superior Court shall be given the same weight and
consideration as prior decisions of the Land Use Review Board.
(c) Appeals to Supreme Court. An appeal from a decision of the Board
under subsection (a) of this section shall be to the Supreme Court by a party as
set forth in subsection 6085(c) of this title.
(d) Objections. No objection that has not been raised before the Board may
be considered by the Supreme Court, unless the failure or neglect to urge such
objection shall be excused because of extraordinary circumstances.
(e) Appeals of decisions. An appeal of a decision by the Board shall be
allowed pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 815, including regarding the unreasonableness
or insufficiency of the conditions attached to a permit. An appeal from the
District Commission shall be allowed for any reason, except no appeal shall be
allowed when an application has been granted and no hearing was requested.
(f) Precedent. Precedent from the former Environmental Board and of the
Land Use Review Board that interprets this chapter shall be provided the same
deference by the Supreme Court as precedents accorded to other Executive
Branch agencies charged with administering their enabling act. On appeal to
the Supreme Court from the Environmental Review Board, decisions of the
Land Use Review Board interpreting this act also shall be accorded that
deference.
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 7 of 22
(g) Clearly erroneous. Upon appeal to the Supreme Court, the Board’s
findings of fact shall be accepted unless clearly erroneous.
(h) Completion of case. A case shall be deemed completed when the Board
enters a final decision even if that decision is appealed to the Supreme Court
and remanded by that Court.
(i) Court of record; jurisdiction. The Board shall have the powers of a
court of record in the determination and adjudication of all matters within its
jurisdiction. It may initiate proceedings on any matter within its jurisdiction.
It may render judgments and enforce the same by any suitable process issuable
by courts in this State. An order issued by the Board on any matter within its
jurisdiction shall have the effect of a judicial order. The Board’s jurisdiction
shall include:
(1) the issuance of declaratory rulings on the applicability of this chapter
and rules or orders issued under this chapter, pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 808; and
(2) the issuance of decisions on appeals pursuant to sections 6007 and
6089 of this title.
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 6007 is amended to read:
§ 6007. ACT 250 DISCLOSURE STATEMENT; JURISDICTIONAL
DETERMINATION
* * *
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 8 of 22
(c) With respect to the partition or division of land, or with respect to an
activity that might or might not constitute development, any person may
submit to the district coordinator an “Act 250 Disclosure Statement” and other
information required by the rules of the Board and may request a jurisdictional
opinion from the district coordinator concerning the applicability of this
chapter. If a requestor wishes a final determination to be rendered on the
question, the district coordinator, at the expense of the requestor and in
accordance with rules of the Board, shall publish notice of the issuance of the
opinion in a local newspaper generally circulating in the area where the land
that is the subject of the opinion is located and shall serve the opinion on all
persons listed in subdivisions 6085(c)(1)(A) through (D) of this title. In
addition, the requestor who is seeking a final determination shall consult with
the district coordinator and obtain approval of a subdivision 6085(c)(1)(E) list
of persons who shall be notified by the district coordinator because they are
adjoining property owners or other persons who would be likely to be able to
demonstrate a particularized interest protected by this chapter that may be
affected by an act or decision by a District Commission.
(d) Appeals to the Board.
(1) The appellant shall provide notice of the filing of an appeal to each
person entitled to notice under subdivisions 6085(c)(1)(A)–(D) of this title and
to each person on an approved subdivision 6085(c)(1)(E) list.
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 9 of 22
(2) Failure to appeal within 30 days following the issuance of the
jurisdictional opinion shall render the decision of the district coordinator under
subsection (c) of this section the final determination regarding jurisdiction
unless the underlying jurisdictional opinion was not properly served on persons
listed in subdivisions 6085(c)(1)(A)–(D) of this title and on persons on a
subdivision 6085(c)(1)(E) list approved under subsection (c) of this section.
Sec. 6. 10 V.S.A. § 6083a is amended to read:
§ 6083a. ACT 250 FEES
* * *
(k) All persons filing an appeal, cross appeal, or petition from a District
Commission decision or jurisdictional opinion shall pay a fee of $295.00, plus
publication costs, unless the Board approves a waiver of fees based on
indigency.
Sec. 7. 10 V.S.A. chapter 220 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 220. CONSOLIDATED ENVIRONMENTAL APPEALS
§ 8501. PURPOSE
It is the purpose of this chapter to:
(1) consolidate existing appeal routes for municipal zoning and
subdivision decisions and acts or decisions of the Secretary of Natural
Resources, district environmental coordinators, and District Commissions,
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 10 of 22
excluding enforcement actions brought pursuant to chapters 201 and 211 of
this title and the adoption of rules under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25;
(2) standardize the appeal periods, the parties who may appeal these acts
or decisions, and the ability to stay any act or decision upon appeal, taking into
account the nature of the different programs affected;
(3) encourage people to get involved in the Act 250 permitting process
at the initial stages of review by a District Commission by requiring
participation as a prerequisite for an appeal of a District Commission decision
to the Environmental Division;
(4) assure ensure that clear appeal routes exist for acts and decisions of
the Secretary of Natural Resources; and
(5)(4) consolidate appeals of decisions related to renewable energy
generation plants and telecommunications facilities with review under,
respectively, 30 V.S.A. §§ 248 and 248a, with appeals and consolidation of
proceedings pertaining to telecommunications facilities occurring only while
30 V.S.A. § 248a remains in effect.
§ 8502. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “District Commission” means a District Environmental Commission
established under chapter 151 of this title. [Repealed.]
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 11 of 22
(2) “District coordinator” means a district environmental coordinator
attached to a District Commission established under chapter 151 of this title.
[Repealed.]
(3) “Environmental Court” or “Environmental Division” means the
Environmental Division of the Superior Court established by 4 V.S.A. § 30.
(4) “Land Use Review Board” or “Board” means the Board established
under chapter 151 of this title.
(5) “Party by right” means the following:
(A) the applicant;
(B) the landowner, if the applicant is not the landowner;
(C) the municipality in which the project site is located and the
municipal and regional planning commissions for that municipality;
(D) if the project site is located on a boundary, any Vermont
municipality adjacent to that border and the municipal and regional planning
commissions for that municipality;
(E) the solid waste management district in which the land is located,
if the development or subdivision constitutes a facility pursuant to subdivision
6602(10) of this title; and
(F) any State agency affected by the proposed project.
(6) “Person” means any individual; partnership; company; corporation;
association; joint venture; trust; municipality; the State of Vermont or any
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 12 of 22
agency, department, or subdivision of the State; any federal agency; or any
other legal or commercial entity.
(7) “Person aggrieved” means a person who alleges an injury to a
particularized interest protected by the provisions of law listed in section 8503
of this title, attributable to an act or decision by a district coordinator, District
Commission, the Secretary, or the Environmental Division that can be
redressed by the Environmental Division or the Supreme Court.
(8) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources or the
Secretary’s duly authorized representative. As used in this chapter,
“Secretary” shall also mean means the Commissioner of Environmental
Conservation,; the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation,; and the
Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife, with respect to those statutes that refer to
the authority of that commissioner or department.
§ 8503. APPLICABILITY
(a) This chapter shall govern all appeals of an act or decision of the
Secretary, excluding enforcement actions under chapters 201 and 211 of this
title and rulemaking, under the following authorities and under the rules
adopted under those authorities:
* * *
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 13 of 22
(b) This chapter shall govern:
(1) all appeals from an act or decision of a District Commission under
chapter 151 of this title, excluding appeals of application fee refund requests;
(2) appeals from an act or decision of a district coordinator under
subsection 6007(c) of this title; and
(3) appeals from findings of fact and conclusions of law issued by the
Land Use Review Board in its review of a designated growth center for
conformance with the criteria of subsection 6086(a) of this title, pursuant to
authority granted at 24 V.S.A. § 2793c(f).
(c) This chapter shall govern all appeals arising under 24 V.S.A.
chapter 117, the planning and zoning chapter.
(d) This chapter shall govern all appeals from an act or decision of the
Environmental Division under this chapter.
(e) This chapter shall not govern appeals from rulemaking decisions by the
Land Use Review Board under chapter 151 of this title or enforcement actions
under chapters 201 and 211 of this title.
(f) This chapter shall govern all appeals of acts or decisions of the
legislative body of a municipality arising under 24 V.S.A. chapter 61,
subchapter 10, relating to the municipal certificate of approved location for
salvage yards.
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 14 of 22
(g) This chapter shall govern all appeals of an act or decision of the
Secretary of Natural Resources that a solid waste implementation plan for a
municipality proposed under 24 V.S.A. § 2202a conforms with the State Solid
Waste Implementation Plan adopted pursuant to section 6604 of this title.
§ 8504. APPEALS TO THE ENVIRONMENTAL DIVISION
(a) Act 250 and Agency appeals. Within 30 days of following the date of
the act or decision, any person aggrieved by an act or decision of the Secretary,
a District Commission, or a district coordinator under the provisions of law
listed in section 8503 of this title, or any party by right, may appeal to the
Environmental Division, except for an act or decision of the Secretary under
subdivision 6086b(3)(E) of this title or governed by section 8506 of this title.
* * *
(c) Notice of the filing of an appeal.
(1) Upon filing an appeal from an act or decision of the District
Commission, the appellant shall notify all parties who had party status as of the
end of the District Commission proceeding, all friends of the Commission, and
the Land Use Review Board that an appeal is being filed. In addition, the
appellant shall publish notice not more than 10 days after providing notice as
required under this subsection, at the appellant’s expense, in a newspaper of
general circulation in the area of the project that is the subject of the decision.
[Repealed.]
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 15 of 22
* * *
(d) Requirement to participate before the District Commission or the
Secretary.
(1) Participation before District Commission. An aggrieved person shall
not appeal an act or decision that was made by a District Commission unless
the person was granted party status by the District Commission pursuant to
subdivision 6085(c)(1)(E) of this title, participated in the proceedings before
the District Commission, and retained party status at the end of the District
Commission proceedings. In addition, the person may only appeal those issues
under the criteria with respect to which the person was granted party status.
However, notwithstanding these limitations, an aggrieved person may appeal
an act or decision of the District Commission if the Environmental judge
determines that:
(A) there was a procedural defect that prevented the person from
obtaining party status or participating in the proceeding;
(B) the decision being appealed is the grant or denial of party status;
or
(C) some other condition exists that would result in manifest injustice
if the person’s right to appeal was disallowed. [Repealed.]
(2) Participation before the Secretary.
* * *
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 16 of 22
(e) Act 250 jurisdictional determinations by a district coordinator.
(1) The appellant shall provide notice of the filing of an appeal to each
person entitled to notice under subdivisions 6085(c)(1)(A) through (D) of this
title, to each person on an approved subdivision 6085(c)(1)(E) list, and to the
Land Use Review Board.
(2) Failure to appeal within the time required under subsection (a) of
this section shall render the decision of the district coordinator under
subsection 6007(c) of this title the final determination regarding jurisdiction
under chapter 151 of this title unless the underlying jurisdictional opinion was
not properly served on persons listed in subdivisions 6085(c)(1)(A) through
(D) of this title and on persons on a subdivision 6085(c)(1)(E) list approved
under subsection 6007(c) of this title. [Repealed.]
* * *
(g) Consolidated appeals. The Environmental Division may consolidate or
coordinate different appeals where those appeals all relate to the same project.
* * *
(i) Deference to Agency technical determinations. In the adjudication of
appeals relating to land use permits under chapter 151 of this title, technical
determinations of the Secretary shall be accorded the same deference as they
are accorded by a District Commission under subsection 6086(d) of this title.
[Repealed.]
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 17 of 22
* * *
(k) Limitations on appeals. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
section:,
(1) there shall be no appeal from a District Commission decision when
the Commission has issued a permit and no hearing was requested or held, or
no motion to alter was filed following the issuance of an administrative
amendment;
(2) a municipal decision regarding whether a particular application
qualifies for a recorded hearing under 24 V.S.A. § 4471(b) shall not be subject
to appeal;
(3) if a District Commission issues a partial decision under subsection
6086(b) of this title, any appeal of that decision must be taken within 30 days
of the date of that decision; and
(4) it shall be the goal of the Environmental Division to issue a decision
on a case regarding an appeal of an appropriate municipal panel decision under
24 V.S.A. chapter 117 within 90 days following the close of the hearing.
(l) Representation. The Secretary may represent the Agency of Natural
Resources in all appeals under this section. The Chair of the Land Use Review
Board may represent the Board in any appeal under this section, unless the
Board directs otherwise. If more than one State agency, other than the Board,
either appeals or seeks to intervene in an appeal under this section, only the
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 18 of 22
Attorney General may represent the interests of those agencies of the State in
the appeal.
(m) Precedent. Prior decisions of the Environmental Board, Water
Resources Board, and Waste Facilities Panel shall be given the same weight
and consideration as prior decisions of the Environmental Division.
(n) Intervention. Any person may intervene in a pending appeal if that
person:
(1) appeared as a party in the action appealed from and retained party
status;
(2) is a party by right;
(3) is the Land Use Review Board; [Repealed.]
(4) is a person aggrieved, as defined in this chapter;
(5) qualifies as an “interested person,” as established in 24 V.S.A.
§ 4465, with respect to appeals under 24 V.S.A. chapter 117; or
(6) meets the standard for intervention established in the Vermont Rules
of Civil Procedure.
(o) With respect to review of an act or decision of the Secretary pursuant to
3 V.S.A. § 2809, the Division may reverse the act or decision or amend an
allocation of costs to an applicant only if the Division determines that the act,
decision, or allocation was arbitrary, capricious, or an abuse of discretion. In
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 19 of 22
the absence of such a determination, the Division shall require the applicant to
pay the Secretary all costs assessed pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 2809.
(p) Administrative record. The Secretary shall certify the administrative
record as defined in chapter 170 of this title and shall transfer a certified copy
of that record to the Environmental Division when:
(1) there is an appeal of an act or decision of the Secretary that is based
on that record; or
(2) there is an appeal of a decision of a District Commission, and the
applicant used a decision of the Secretary based on that record to create a
presumption under a criterion of subsection 6086(a) of this title that is at issue
in the appeal.
* * *
§ 8505. APPEALS TO THE SUPREME COURT
(a) Any person aggrieved by a decision of the Environmental Division
pursuant to this subchapter, any party by right, or any person aggrieved by a
decision of the Environmental Review Board may appeal to the Supreme Court
within 30 days of following the date of the entry of the order or judgment
appealed from, provided that:
(1) the person was a party to the proceeding before the Environmental
Division; or
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 20 of 22
(2) the decision being appealed is the denial of party status; or
(3) the Supreme Court determines that:
(A) there was a procedural defect that prevented the person from
participating in the proceeding; or
(B) some other condition exists that would result in manifest injustice
if the person’s right to appeal were disallowed.
* * *
* * * Environmental Division * * *
Sec. 8. 4 V.S.A. § 34 is amended to read:
§ 34. JURISDICTION; ENVIRONMENTAL DIVISION
The Environmental Division shall have:
(1) jurisdiction of matters arising under 10 V.S.A. chapters 201 and 220;
and
(2) jurisdiction of matters arising under 24 V.S.A. chapter 61,
subchapter 12 and 24 V.S.A. chapter 117; and
(3) original jurisdiction to revoke permits under 10 V.S.A. chapter 151.
Sec. 9. 24 V.S.A. § 4471 is amended to read:
§ 4471. APPEAL TO ENVIRONMENTAL DIVISION OR LAND USE
REVIEW BOARD
(a) Participation required. An interested person who has participated in a
municipal regulatory proceeding authorized under this title may appeal a
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 21 of 22
decision rendered in that proceeding by an appropriate municipal panel to the
Environmental Division or if the same project is subject to appeal at the Land
Use Review Board, may file a consolidated appeal with the Board.
Participation in a local regulatory proceeding shall consist of offering, through
oral or written testimony, evidence or a statement of concern related to the
subject of the proceeding. An appeal from a decision of the appropriate
municipal panel, or from a decision of the municipal legislative body under
subsection 4415(d) of this title, shall be taken in such manner as the Supreme
Court may by rule provide for appeals from State agencies governed by
3 V.S.A. §§ 801–816, unless the decision is an appropriate municipal panel
decision which the municipality has elected to be subject to review on the
record.
* * *
Sec. 10. RULEMAKING
The Environmental Review Board shall adopt rules of procedure for its
hearing process pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 6025(a) on or before January 1, 2028.
Sec. 11. CHECK-IN REPORT
On or before October 1, 2027, the Chair of the Land Use Review Board
shall report on the status of the Board’s workload, capacity, and numbers of
recent appeals. The report shall describe the steps the Board has taken to
prepare to take on hearing permit appeals. The report shall assess the Board’s
VT LEG #385895 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.169
2026 Page 22 of 22
ability to take on appeals of municipal permits and propose a timeline for
doing so. The report shall be submitted to the House Committee on
Environment and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy.
Sec. 12. ENVIRONMENTAL DIVISION; CONTINUED JURISDICTION
Notwithstanding the repeal of its jurisdictional authority to hear appeals
relative to land use permits under Sec. 7 of this act, the Environmental
Division of the Superior Court shall continue to have jurisdiction to complete
its consideration of any appeal that is pending before it as of July 1, 2028, if
the act or appeal has been filed.
Sec. 13. APPROPRIATIONS; POSITION
(a) In fiscal year 2027, the sum of $125,000.00 from the General Fund to
the Land Use Review Board for the set-up costs for the permit appeal process.
(b) In fiscal year 2027, the sum of $175,000.00 from the General Fund to
the Land Use Review Board for the position established in subsection (c) of
this section.
(c) There is established one new full-time Legal Services Specialist
position at the Land Use Review Board.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 14. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385895 v.2